Utah statutes.
32A-4a-201.   Commission's power to license a resort -- Limitations.
(1) (a)  The commission may grant to a person a resort license for the purpose
of allowing the storage, sale, service, and consumption of an alcoholic
beverage in connection with a resort designated in the resort license if the
person operates at least four sublicenses under the resort license.
(b)  A resort license shall:
(i)  consist of:
(A)  a general resort license; and
(B)  the four or more sublicenses; and
(ii)  designate the boundary of the resort building.
(c)  This chapter does not prohibit an alcoholic beverage on the boundary of
the resort building to the extent otherwise permitted by this title.
(d)  The commission may not grant a sublicense that is separate from a resort
license.
(2) (a)  The total number of resort licenses may not at any time aggregate
more than four.
(b)  The commission may not include a sublicense in determining whether or not
the total number of licenses granted under the provisions applicable to the
sublicense aggregate more than a number calculated by dividing the population
of the state by the number specified in the provisions applicable to the
sublicense.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b), the commission may not grant to a
person a license under the provisions applicable to a sublicense that on May
11, 2009, was not available because the sublicense was included in determining
if the total number of licenses granted under the provisions applicable to the
sublicense aggregate more than the number calculated by dividing the
population of the state by the number specified in the provisions applicable
to the sublicense.
(d)  By no later than the November 2009 interim meeting of the Business and
Labor Interim Committee, the department shall:
(i)  report to the Business and Labor Interim Committee the number and types
of sublicenses under a resort license granted by the commission as of
September 30, 2009; and
(ii)  recommend legislation to adjust the numbers in the provisions applicable
to sublicenses to reflect the number of sublicenses that because of the
issuance of a resort license are not included in determining whether or not
the total number of licenses granted under the provisions applicable to a
sublicense aggregate more than a number calculated by dividing the population
of the state by the number specified in the provisions applicable to the
sublicense.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), (c), or (d), a resort
building may not be granted if the resort building is:
(i)  within 600 feet of a community location, as measured by the method in
Subsection (3)(e); or
(ii)  within 200 feet of a community location, measured in a straight line
from the nearest entrance of the proposed outlet to the nearest property
boundary of the community location.
(b)  With respect to the establishment of a resort license, the commission may
authorize a variance to reduce the proximity requirement of Subsection
(3)(a)(i) if:
(i)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(ii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a
resort license in the community are limited;
(iii)  the variance is authorized after a public hearing is held in the city,
town, or county, and where practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(iv)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances
and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the resort license would not be detrimental to
the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(v) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the
resort building is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(b)(v)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a resort license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the resort building is to
be located for establishing a resort license to satisfy the unmet demand
described in Subsection (3)(b)(v)(B)(I).
(c)  With respect to the establishment of a resort license, the commission may
authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement of Subsection
(3)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the community location at issue is:
(A)  a public library; or
(B)  a public park;
(ii)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(iii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a
resort license in the community are limited;
(iv)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(v)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and
the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the resort license would not be detrimental to
the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community; and
(vi) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the
resort building is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (3)(c)(vi)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a resort license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the resort building is to
be located for establishing a resort license to satisfy the unmet demand
described in Subsection (3)(c)(vi)(B)(I).
(d)  With respect to a resort building of a resort license granted by the
commission that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission may waive or
vary the proximity requirements of Subsection (3)(a) in considering whether to
grant a resort license to the new owner of the resort license if the resort
license previously received a variance reducing the proximity requirement of
Subsection (3)(a)(i).
(e)  The 600 foot limitation described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) is measured
from the nearest entrance of the outlet by following the shortest route of
ordinary pedestrian travel to the property boundary of the community location.
(4) (a)  Nothing in this section prevents the commission from considering the
proximity of an educational, religious, or recreational facility, or any other
relevant factor in reaching a decision on a proposed location.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (4), "educational facility" includes:
(i)  a nursery school;
(ii)  an infant day care center; and
(iii)  a trade and technical school.
